Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4734.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204B.49, is amended to read: 204B.49 "I VOTED" STICKERS. new text begin (a) new text end The secretary of state, county auditor, municipal clerk, school district clerk, or an election judge may provide a sticker containing the words "I VOTED," and nothing more, to an individual who: (1) has successfully deposited a ballot into a ballot box; (2) is provided an absentee ballot under section 203B.07, subdivision 1, or 203B.21, subdivision 2; or (3) is provided a ballot by mail under section 204B.45 or 204B.46. new text begin (b) The secretary of state, county auditor, municipal clerk, or school district clerk may periodically administer a competition to update the "I VOTED" sticker design. An updated design may include graphic design elements, but it must only include the words "I VOTED," and its imagery must not advocate for or against any political party, candidate, ballot question, or public policy issue, or include any other words or numbers. Nothing in this section prohibits a design competition from resulting in multiple winning designs. new text end